Nevada, session 83, AB398.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 387 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 and 3 of this act.
Sec. 2. 1. To the extent that money has been appropriated
for that purpose, the Department shall award money to school
districts to provide compensation, in addition to base pay, for
hard-to-fill positions in the public schools of this State.
2. It is the intent of the Legislature that the additional
compensation for hard-to-fill positions funded pursuant to
subsection 1 is a temporary solution to ameliorate the urgent
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
problem of high teacher vacancy rates, which are detrimental to
student outcomes.
3. An application by a school district applying for an award
of money pursuant to subsection 1 must include:
(a) The total amount of money which the school district is
requesting;
(b) The total number of hard-to-fill positions in public schools
for which the school district intends to provide additional
compensation using the money requested;
(c) Documentation sufficient to demonstrate that each hard-to-
fill position for which the school district intends to provide
additional compensation using the money requested was filled
during the immediately preceding calendar quarter; and
(d) Such other information or documentation as the
Department may require.
4. Money awarded to a school district pursuant to subsection
1 is subject to collective bargaining, but may only be used to
provide additional compensation for hard-to-fill positions in
public schools.
5. Not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year,
each school district shall submit a report to the Office of Finance
and the Interim Finance Committee that states:
(a) The total number of teachers in the school district
receiving additional compensation funded pursuant to this section
during the then-current school year;
(b) The total amount of the additional compensation funded
from an award made pursuant to this section that is being
provided to teachers during the then-current school year; and
(c) The total number of hard-to-fill positions in public schools
in the school district.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Hard-to-fill position” means:
(1) A teacher position at a Title I school which has:
(I) A vacancy rate for teacher positions of 15 percent or
more, if the school is a high school;
(II) A vacancy rate for teacher positions of 12 percent or
more, if the school is a middle school or junior high school; or
(III) A vacancy rate for teacher positions of 10 percent
or more, if the school is an elementary school.
(2) A teacher position or other position staffed by a person
licensed pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS:
(I) Who is the teacher of record assigned to a classroom
of pupils; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
(II) Whose duties include actively teaching pupils
during a class period, for the majority of class periods during the
school day, in English language arts, mathematics, science or
special education, if such subjects are suffering from a critical
labor shortage, as determined by the board of trustees of the
school district.
(b) “Public school” does not include a public school that is
formed pursuant to the provisions of chapter 388A of NRS.
Secs. 3-7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8. NRS 387.12445 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.12445 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
each school district shall ensure that all adjusted base per pupil
funding received by the school district pursuant to paragraph (c) of
subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214 is accounted for separately and, after
a deduction for the administrative expenses of the school district in
an amount which does not exceed the amount prescribed by the
Department by regulation for each school district, be distributed and
used as described in this subsection. The adjusted base per pupil
funding provided to each school district must:
(a) Be distributed by each school district to its public schools in
a manner that ensures each pupil in the school district receives a
reasonably equal educational opportunity.
(b) Be used to support the educational needs of all pupils in the
school district, including, without limitation, operating each public
school in the school district, training and supporting educational
personnel and carrying out any program or service established by, or
requirement imposed pursuant to, this title for any purpose for
which specific funding is not appropriated pursuant to paragraph (a),
(b) or (e) of subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214 or NRS 387.122.
2. If a school district determines that an additional amount of
money is necessary to satisfy requirements for maintenance of effort
or any other requirement under federal law for pupils with
disabilities enrolled in the school district, the school district may
transfer the necessary amount of money from the adjusted base per
pupil funding received by the school district for that purpose.
3. Each school district shall ensure that all weighted funding
received by the school district pursuant to paragraph (e) of
subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214 is accounted for separately and
distributed directly to each school in which the relevant pupils are
estimated to be enrolled.
4. Each public school shall account separately for the local
funding for pupils with disabilities received by the public school
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214, for the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
adjusted base per pupil funding received by the public school
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214, for each
category of weighted funding received by the public school pursuant
to paragraph (e) of subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214 and for money
received from the statewide multiplier pursuant to NRS 387.122.
Unless the provisions of subsection 7 or 8 impose greater
restrictions on the use of weighted funding by a public school, the
public school must use the weighted funding received for each
relevant pupil:
(a) As a supplement to the adjusted base per pupil funding
received for the pupil; and
(b) Solely for the purpose of providing such additional
educational programs, services or support as are necessary to ensure
the pupil receives a reasonably equal educational opportunity.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the separate
accounting required by subsection 4 for pupils with disabilities and
gifted and talented pupils must include:
(a) The amount of money provided to the public school for
special education; and
(b) The cost of:
(1) Instruction provided by licensed special education
teachers and supporting staff;
(2) Related services, including, without limitation, services
provided by psychologists, therapists and health-related personnel;
(3) Transportation of the pupils with disabilities and gifted
and talented pupils to and from school;
(4) The direct supervision of educational and supporting
programs; and
(5) The supplies and equipment needed for providing special
education.
6. Money received from federal sources must be accounted for
separately and excluded from the accounting required pursuant to
subsection 5.
7. A public school that receives weighted funding for one or
more at-risk pupils must use that weighted funding only to provide
Victory services and, if one or more at-risk pupils for whom the
school received weighted funding in the at-risk pupil category also
belong to one or more other categories of pupils who receive
weighted funding, the additional services for each such at-risk pupil
which are appropriate for each category to which the at-risk pupil
belongs.
8. A public school that receives weighted funding for one or
more pupils who are English learners must use that weighted
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
funding only to provide Zoom services and, if one or more English
learners for whom the school received weighted funding in the
English learner category also belong to one or more other categories
of pupils who receive weighted funding, the additional services for
each such English learner which are appropriate for each category to
which the English learner belongs.
9. The Department shall adopt regulations prescribing the
maximum amount of money that each school district may deduct for
its administrative expenses from the adjusted base per pupil funding
received by the school district. When adopting such regulations, the
Department may express the maximum amount of money that may
be deducted as a percentage of the adjusted base per pupil funding
received by the school district.
10. As used in this section:
(a) “Victory services” means any one or more of the following
services:
(1) A prekindergarten program provided free of charge.
(2) A summer academy or other instruction for pupils
provided free of charge at times during the year when school is not
in session.
(3) Additional instruction or other learning opportunities
provided free of charge at times of day when school is not in
session.
(4) Professional development for teachers and other
educational personnel concerning instructional practices and
strategies that have proven to be an effective means to increase pupil
achievement in populations of at-risk pupils.
(5) [Incentives] In a school district located in a county
whose population is less than 700,000, incentives for hiring and
retaining teachers and other licensed educational personnel who
provide Victory services.
(6) Employment of paraprofessionals, other educational
personnel and other persons who provide Victory services.
(7) A reading skills center.
(8) Integrated student supports, wrap-around services and
evidence-based programs designed to meet the needs of at-risk
pupils.
(9) Any other service or program that has a demonstrated
record of success for similarly situated pupils in comparable school
districts and has been reviewed and approved as a Victory service
by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(b) “Zoom services” means any one or more of the following
services:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
(1) A prekindergarten program provided free of charge.
(2) A reading skills center.
(3) Professional development for teachers and other licensed
educational personnel regarding effective instructional practices and
strategies for pupils who are English learners.
(4) [Incentives] In a school district located in a county
whose population is less than 700,000, incentives for hiring and
retaining teachers and other licensed educational personnel who
provide Zoom services.
(5) Engagement and involvement with parents and families
of pupils who are English learners, including, without limitation,
increasing effective, culturally appropriate communication with and
outreach to parents and families to support the academic
achievement of those pupils.
(6) A summer academy or, for those schools that do not
operate on a traditional school calendar, an intersession academy
provided free of charge, including, without limitation, the provision
of transportation to attend the summer academy or intersession
academy.
(7) An extended school day.
(8) Any other service or program that has a demonstrated
record of success for similarly situated pupils in comparable school
districts and has been reviewed and approved as a Zoom service by
the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
Sec. 8.1. NRS 387.12455 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
387.12455 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5,
for the purpose of establishing budgetary estimates for expenditures
and revenues for the State Education Fund as prescribed by the State
Budget Act, the Governor shall, to the extent practicable, ensure that
an amount of money in the State General Fund is reserved in the
proposed executive budget for transfer to the State Education Fund
which is sufficient to fully fund:
(a) If the Economic Forum projects that the revenue collected by
the State for general, unrestricted uses will increase by a rate that is
greater than the combined rate of inflation and the growth of
enrollment in the public schools in this State in the immediately
preceding biennium, an amount of money in the State General Fund
for transfer to the State Education Fund for the subsequent biennium
which is not less than the amount of money transferred to the State
Education Fund from the State General Fund for the immediately
preceding biennium increased by an amount not less than the rate of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
increase for the revenue collected by the State as projected by the
Economic Forum.
(b) If the Economic Forum projects that the revenue collected by
the State for general, unrestricted uses will increase by a rate that is
not greater than the combined rate of inflation and the growth of
enrollment in the public schools in this State in the immediately
preceding biennium, an amount of money in the State General Fund
for transfer to the State Education Fund for the subsequent biennium
which is not less than the amount of money transferred to the State
Education Fund from the State General Fund for the immediately
preceding biennium increased by an amount not less than the
combined rate of inflation and the growth of enrollment in the
public schools in this State.
(c) If the Economic Forum projects that the revenue collected by
the State for general, unrestricted uses will decrease, an amount of
money in the State General Fund for transfer to the State Education
Fund for the subsequent biennium which is not less than the amount
of money transferred to the State Education Fund from the State
General Fund for the immediately preceding biennium decreased by
an amount not greater than the rate of decrease for the revenue
collected by the State as projected by the Economic Forum.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, as part of the
proposed executive budget, the Governor shall, to the extent
practicable, include recommendations for:
(a) The statewide base per pupil funding amount, which must be
equal to the statewide base per pupil funding amount for the
immediately preceding biennium increased by an amount not less
than the combined rate of inflation and the growth of enrollment in
the public schools in this State unless the amount of money
contained in the State Education Fund, excluding the Education
Stabilization Account, decreases from the immediately preceding
biennium, in which event the Governor must recommend a
proportional reduction to both the statewide base per pupil funding
amount and the multiplier for each category of pupils pursuant to
paragraph (b); [and]
(b) The multiplier for each category of pupils, which must not
be less than the multiplier for the immediately preceding biennium
unless:
(1) The amount of money contained in the State Education
Fund, excluding the Education Stabilization Account, decreases
from the immediately preceding biennium, in which event the
Governor must recommend a proportional reduction to both the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
statewide base per pupil funding amount pursuant to paragraph (a)
and the multiplier for each category of pupils; or
(2) The amount of money contained in the State Education
Fund, excluding the Education Stabilization Account, increases
from the preceding fiscal year but in an amount which, after
recommending the statewide base per pupil funding amount
pursuant to paragraph (a), is insufficient to fund the multiplier for
each category of pupils, in which event the Governor must
recommend the remaining money in the State Education Fund,
excluding the Education Stabilization Account, be used to provide a
multiplier for each category of pupils which is as close as
practicable to the multiplier for the preceding fiscal year [.] ; and
(c) The amount of money to appropriate to the Department to
make awards to school districts pursuant to section 2 of this act.
3. When determining the amount of money to reserve for
transfer from the State General Fund to the State Education Fund
pursuant to subsection 1, the Governor shall consider the
recommendations of the Commission, as revised by the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Education, if applicable, for an
optimal level of funding for education and may reserve an additional
amount of money for transfer to the State Education Fund that the
Governor determines to be sufficient to fund any recommendation
or any portion of a recommendation that the Governor includes in
the proposed executive budget.
4. As part of the proposed executive budget, the Governor may
recommend to the Legislature a revision to any appropriation made
by law pursuant to NRS 387.1214, including, without limitation, the
statewide base per pupil funding amount, the adjusted base per pupil
funding for any school district, the multiplier for weighted funding
for any category of pupils or the creation or elimination of a
category of pupils to receive additional weighted funding. The
Governor may recommend additional funding for any
recommendation made pursuant to this subsection.
5. If the Governor determines that it would be impracticable to
prepare the proposed executive budget as described in subsection 1
or 2, the Governor may instead include in the proposed executive
budget a recommendation for such funding for the public schools in
this State as he or she determines to be appropriate. If the Governor
includes in the proposed executive budget recommendations
pursuant to this subsection, the recommendations must be
accompanied by such recommendations for legislation as the
Governor determines to be appropriate to improve the method by
which funding for the public schools in this State is determined.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
6. As used in this section, “rate of inflation” means the average
percentage of increase or decrease in the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers, West Region (All Items), as published by the
United States Department of Labor for the immediately preceding 3
calendar years or, if that index ceases to be published by the United
States Department of Labor, the published index that most closely
resembles that index, as determined by the Governor.
Sec. 8.3. NRS 218E.415 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.415 1. The members of the Subcommittee on
Education Accountability of the Interim Finance Committee shall
meet at least twice annually at the times and places specified by a
call of the Chair of the Subcommittee or a majority of the
Subcommittee.
2. A meeting held jointly by the Assembly Standing
Committee on Ways and Means and the Senate Standing Committee
on Finance during a regular session that has agenda items similar to
subsection 4 constitutes a meeting of the Subcommittee.
3. A majority of the members of the Subcommittee constitutes
a quorum.
4. The general objectives and functions of the Subcommittee
are to discuss, evaluate and make recommendations relating to
accountability in public education in this State to improve the
educational achievements and outcomes for pupils. The
Subcommittee may study, without limitation:
(a) Fiscal policy, school finance or similar or related financial
activities;
(b) The sufficiency of current revenue and expenditures relating
to public education in this State and the anticipated revenue and
expenditures that are necessary to improve educational
achievements and outcomes for pupils;
(c) Administrative support and policies;
(d) Corrective action plans for public schools to improve
educational achievements and outcomes; [and]
(e) The rules, regulations and policies of individual school
districts or public schools [.] ; and
(f) The compensation paid to teachers at public schools to
determine whether such compensation is sufficient to ensure
competitiveness with other states and optimal educational
achievements and outcomes for pupils.
5. The Subcommittee may conduct investigations and hold
hearings in connection with its functions and duties and exercise any
of the investigative powers set forth in NRS 218E.105 to 218E.140,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
inclusive, including, without limitation, compelling the attendance
at any meeting of the Subcommittee of:
(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction;
(b) Any member of the State Board of Education;
(c) Any member of a board of trustees of a school district in this
State;
(d) Any superintendent or chief financial officer of a school
district in this State; or
(e) The Executive Director of the State Public Charter School
Authority.
6. Except during a regular or special session of the Legislature,
for each day or portion of a day during which a member of
the Subcommittee or appointed alternate attends a meeting of the
Subcommittee or is otherwise engaged in the business of the
Subcommittee, the member or appointed alternate, as applicable, is
entitled to receive:
(a) The compensation provided for a majority of the Legislators
during the first 60 days of the preceding regular session;
(b) The per diem allowance provided for state officers and
employees generally; and
(c) The travel expenses provided pursuant to NRS 218A.655.
7. All such compensation, per diem allowances and travel
expenses of a member or appointed alternate of the Subcommittee
must be paid from the Contingency Fund in the State Treasury.
Sec. 8.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Interim Finance Committee for allocation to the
Department of Education to distribute to school districts pursuant to
subsection 3 the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................. $45,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................. $45,000,000
2. Money appropriated pursuant to subsection 1 may only be
allocated to the Department by the Interim Finance Committee
upon:
(a) Submittal of a plan by the Department to distribute the
money to school districts to provide compensation, in addition to
base pay, for hard-to-fill positions in the public schools of this State;
and
(b) The determination of the Interim Finance Committee that the
plan submitted by the Department is consistent with the
requirements of this section and is reasonably calculated to
ameliorate the urgent problem of high teacher vacancy rates.
3. The Department shall distribute the money allocated to the
Department from the appropriation made by subsection 1 to school
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
districts in accordance with the plan submitted to the Interim
Finance Committee pursuant to subsection 2.
4. On or before June 9, 2025, and June 8, 2026, each school
district in this State shall report to the Department and the Interim
Finance Committee for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year
2026-2027, respectively:
(a) The total amount of money which the school district is
requesting from the appropriation made by subsection 1; and
(b) The total number of hard-to-fill positions in public schools in
the school district for which the school district intends to provide
additional compensation using money appropriated by subsection 1.
5. Money distributed to a school district pursuant to subsection
3 is subject to collective bargaining, but may only be used to
provide additional compensation for hard-to-fill positions in public
schools.
6. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Hard-to-fill position” means:
(1) A teacher position at a Title I school which has:
(I) A vacancy rate for teacher positions of 15 percent or
more, if the school is a high school;
(II) A vacancy rate for teacher positions of 12 percent or
more, if the school is a middle school or junior high school; or
(III) A vacancy rate for teacher positions of 10 percent or
more, if the school is an elementary school.
(2) A teacher position or other position staffed by a person
licensed pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS:
(I) Who is the teacher of record assigned to a classroom
of pupils; and
(II) Whose duties include actively teaching pupils during
a class period, for the majority of class periods during the school
day, in English language arts, mathematics, science or special
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
education, if such subjects are suffering from a critical labor
shortage, as determined by the board of trustees of the school
district.
(b) “Public school” does not include a public school that is
formed pursuant to the provisions of chapter 388A of NRS.
Sec. 8.7. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Interim Finance Committee for allocation to the
State Public Charter School Authority to provide money to charter
schools for salary increases for teachers and education support
professionals the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................. $19,314,297
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................. $19,314,297
2. On or before June 15, 2025, each charter school in this State
shall submit to the State Public Charter School Authority a
statement of the number of teachers and education support
professionals employed by the charter school on October 1, 2024.
The State Public Charter School Authority shall compile this
information and, not later than July 15, 2025:
(a) Submit the compiled information to the Interim Finance
Committee.
(b) Estimate the total amount of money which the Authority will
be authorized to distribute to each charter school for Fiscal Year
2025-2026 pursuant to subsection 7 and provide this information to
each charter school.
3. On or before June 15, 2026, each charter school in this State
shall submit to the State Public Charter School Authority a
statement of the number of teachers and education support
professionals employed by the charter school on October 1, 2025.
The State Public Charter School Authority shall compile this
information and, not later than July 15, 2026:
(a) Submit the compiled information to the Interim Finance
Committee.
(b) Estimate the total amount of money which the Authority will
be authorized to distribute to each charter school for Fiscal Year
2026-2027 pursuant to subsection 7 and provide this information to
each charter school.
4. On or before August 15, 2025, and August 15, 2026, each
charter school in this State shall submit to the State Public Charter
School Authority a plan by the charter school to increase salaries for
teachers and education support professionals during the then-current
fiscal year which:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(a) Describes the manner in which money distributed to the
charter school will be allocated among the teachers and education
support professionals employed by the charter school; and
(b) Provides for an increase in salary for teachers and education
support professionals which does not replace or supplant any other
form of compensation which was provided to teachers or education
support professionals of the charter school before Fiscal Year
2025-2026 or which was bargained for or planned for Fiscal Year
2025-2026 or any succeeding fiscal year before the effective date of
this section.
5. On or before September 15, 2025, and September 15, 2026,
the State Public Charter School Authority shall compile and submit
to the Interim Finance Committee the plans submitted by each
charter school for the then-current fiscal year pursuant to
subsection 4.
6. Money appropriated by subsection 1 may only be allocated
to the State Public Charter School Authority by the Interim Finance
Committee upon request by the Authority after the Authority has
complied with the requirements of subsection 2 or 3, as applicable,
and subsection 5.
7. The amount of money distributed by the State Public Charter
School Authority to a charter school pursuant to this section must
not exceed an amount which is equal to:
(a) For Fiscal Year 2025-2026, $19,314,297 multiplied by a
percentage which is the number of teachers and education support
professionals employed by the charter school on October 1, 2024,
expressed as a percentage of the total number of teachers and
education support professionals employed in all of the charter
schools in this State on October 1, 2024.
(b) For Fiscal Year 2026-2027, $19,314,297 multiplied by a
percentage which is the number of teachers and education support
professionals employed by the charter school on October 1, 2025,
expressed as a percentage of the total number of teachers and
education support professionals employed in all of the charter
schools in this State on October 1, 2025.
8. Money appropriated by subsection 1 may only be distributed
by the Authority to a charter school which has complied with the
requirements of subsection 2 or 3, as applicable, and subsection 4.
9. The money appropriated by subsection 1 must be used to
supplement and not supplant or cause to be reduced any other source
of funding for the support of charter schools or for the salary and
compensation of teachers or education support professionals
employed by any charter school.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
10. On or before August 1, 2026, and August 1, 2027, each
charter school in this State that received a distribution from the
money appropriated by subsection 1 during Fiscal Year 2025-2026
and Fiscal Year 2026-2027, respectively, shall submit a report to the
State Public Charter School Authority which includes, without
limitation:
(a) Detailed information on how all the money received pursuant
to this section was spent by the charter school during the
immediately preceding fiscal year; and
(b) The actual increase to the salary of teachers and education
support professionals employed by the charter school during the
immediately preceding fiscal year and the amount of such an
increase for which the money received pursuant to this section was
spent.
11. On or before October 1, 2026, and October 1, 2027, the
State Public Charter School Authority shall compile and submit to
the Interim Finance Committee the reports received by the Authority
pursuant to subsection 10 with respect to the immediately preceding
fiscal year.
12. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
13. As used in this section:
(a) “Administrator” means a person who spends at least 50
percent of his or her work year supervising other staff or licensed
personnel, or both, and who is not classified by the governing body
of a charter school as a professional-technical employee.
(b) “Education support professional” means a person, other than
a teacher or administrator, who is employed to work at a charter
school, including, without limitation:
(1) Paraprofessionals;
(2) School police officers, school resource officers and other
providers of security services at a school;
(3) School nurses;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
(4) School counselors;
(5) School psychologists;
(6) School social workers;
(7) Drivers of school buses;
(8) Secretaries;
(9) Members of the custodial or maintenance staff; and
(10) Workers in food services.
(c) “Teacher” means a person licensed pursuant to chapter 391
of NRS who is classified by the governing body of a charter school:
(1) As a teacher and who spends at least 50 percent of his or
her work year providing instruction or discipline to pupils; or
(2) As instructional support staff, who does not hold a
supervisory position and who spends not more than 50 percent of
his or her work year providing instruction to pupils. Such
instructional support staff includes, without limitation, librarians
and persons who provide instructional support.
Sec. 8.9. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 2 of this
act, for the report required to be submitted on or before December 1,
2026, pursuant to subsection 5 of section 2 of this act, each school
district is not required to submit the information described in
paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 5 of section 2 of this act and shall
instead include in the report:
1. The total number of teachers in the school district receiving
additional compensation funded pursuant to section 8.5 of this act
during the then-current school year; and
2. The total amount of the additional compensation funded
from an award made pursuant to section 8.5 of this act that is being
provided to teachers during the then-current school year.
Sec. 9. 1. This section and sections 8.5, 8.7 and 8.9 of this
act become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 8 and 8.3 of this act become effective on July 1,
2025.
3. Sections 1, 2 and 8.1 of this act become effective on
October 1, 2026.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)